Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2424
Animal feeding operation; operating requirements; when.

Any animal feeding operation which was in existence on January 1, 2004, and does not have any permit on March 17, 2006, shall be subject, in addition to any other requirements of the Environmental Protection Act, Livestock Waste Management Act, and rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to such acts, to the same or substantially similar operating requirements as the requirements that existed on January 1, 2004.

Laws 2004, LB 916, § 13;

Laws 2006, LB 975, § 7.

Environmental Protection Act, see section 81-1532.